ces-rus_present/apertium/apertium-ces/apertium-ces.ces.dix
    <pardef n="evrop/ský__adj">
      <e><p><l>ští</l><r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ští</l><r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sk</l><r>ský<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__nový"/></e>
      <e><p><l>sko</l><r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>štějš</l><r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__další"/></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="exotermi/cký__adj">
      <e><p><l>čtí</l><r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čtí</l><r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ck</l><r>cký<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__nový"/></e>
      <e><p><l>cko</l><r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čtějš</l><r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__další"/></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="novouč/ký__adj">
      <e><p><l>cí</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cí</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>k</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__nový"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ko</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="cel/ý__adj">
      <e><p><l>í</l><r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ý<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__nový"/></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="nej__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nej</l><r>nej<s n="adv"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   </pardefs>

    <e lm="celý"><i>cel</i><par n="cel/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="novoučký"><p><l>novouč</l><r>nový</r></p><par n="novouč/ký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zlatý"><i>zlat</i><par n="cel/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="antický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>anti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="beletristický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>beletristi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="biskajský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>biskaj</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrácký"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>dobrá</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="dobrý"><par n="nej__adv"/><p><l>dobřejš</l><r>dobrý</r></p><par n="menš/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="epický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>epi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fotogenický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>fotogeni</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="grafický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>grafi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="irský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>ir</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="irácký"><par n="nej__adv"/><p><l>ira</l><r>irá</r></p><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jizerský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>jizer</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="komický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>komi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="královský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>králov</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="křesťanský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>křesťan</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="liberecký"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>libere</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="magnetický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>magneti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="metabolický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>metaboli</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mořský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>moř</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nacionalistický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>nacionalisti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="optický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>opti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="partyzánský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>partyzán</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="platonický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>platoni</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="proletářský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>proletář</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="příznivý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>přízniv</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skeptický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>skepti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="spravedlivý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>spravedliv</i><par n="cel/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tektonický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>tektoni</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tepelný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>tepeln</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="typografický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>typografi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vegetariánský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>vegetarián</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="víkendový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>víkendov</i><par n="cel/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ústřední"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>ústředn</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="elitářský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>elitář</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lékařský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>lékař</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="romský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>rom</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="východobosenský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>východobosen</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bohatý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>bohat</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="delegovaný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>delegovan</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="etapový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>etapov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jednoznačný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>jednoznačn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lehkovážný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>lehkovážn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nadprůměrný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>nadprůměrn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="obětavý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>obětav</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="opomenout"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>opomenuteln</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="plísňový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>plísňov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pouťový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>pouťov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="přístupový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>přístupov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="řetězový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>řetězov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="šestákový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>šestákov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="spořivý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>spořiv</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="transformovaný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>transformovan</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ustavený"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>ustaven</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vydařený"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>vydařen</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vzhledný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>vzhledn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="závratný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>závratn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zrůdný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>zrůdn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="alchymistický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>alchymisti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="angloamerický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>angloameri</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="artistický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>artisti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="biochemický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>biochemi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="chemický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>chemi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrovolnický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>dobrovolni</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="energetický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>energeti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="faktografický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>faktografi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="frýdecký"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>frýde</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="geologický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>geologi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hradecký"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>hrade</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jihoafrický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>jihoafri</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kopřivnický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>kopřivni</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="latinskoamerický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>latinskoameri</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="marxistický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>marxisti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="modernistický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>modernisti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neoklasický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>neoklasi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="obuvnický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>obuvni</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ortopedický" r="LR"><par n="nej__adv"/><p><l>orthopedi</l><r>ortopedi</r></p><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="počernický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>počerni</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="prorocký"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>proro</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="řeckokatolický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>řeckokatoli</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="severoafrický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>severoafri</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="starořecký"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>staroře</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="syntetický" r="LR"><par n="nej__adv"/><p><l>syntheti</l><r>synteti</r></p><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="třinecký"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>třine</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="utopický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>utopi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vlastenecký"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>vlastene</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="halucinogenní"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>halucinogenn</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="multimediální"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>multimédiáln</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="senzitivní"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>senzitivn</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="několikametrový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>několikametrov</i><par n="trestn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="přetížený"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>přetížen</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
